src/srseng/resources/fst/srs2eng.lexc
< [ y o u %  a l l %  m i g h t %  w a l k %/ g o %  i n %  t h i s %  d i r e c t i o n ] : [ d ō ò s á k ' à s í %  d ī y á %- g ū l à "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  m i g h t %  w a l k %/ g o %  i n %  t h i s %  d i r e c t i o n ] : [ d ō ò s á k ' à s í %  d ī y á %- g ū l à "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  m i g h t %  w a l k %/ g o %  i n %  t h i s %  d i r e c t i o n ] : [ d ō ò s á k ' à s í %  d ī y á %- g ū l à "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a l l %  m i g h t %  g o %/ w a l k %  i n %  t h i s %  d i r e c t i o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a l l %  m i g h t %  g o %/ w a l k %  i n %  t h i s %  d i r e c t i o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a l l %  m i g h t %  g o %/ w a l k %  i n %  t h i s %  d i r e c t i o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ p e o p l e %  a l l %  m i g h t %  g o %/ w a l k %  i n %  t h i s %  d i r e c t i o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  c o m e %/ g o %  i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  c o m e %/ g o %  i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a l l %  c o m e %/ g o %  i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  d o %  n o t %  c o m e %/ g o %  i n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg2" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h e a r d %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h e a r d %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h e a r d %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h e a r d %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h e a r d %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h e a r d %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h e a r d %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h e a r s %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h e a r s %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  s t a r t i n g %  t o %  h e a r %  i t ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  h e a r i n g %  i t ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  h e a r i n g %  i t ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  h e a r i n g %  i t ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  h e a r i n g %  i t ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  h e a r i n g %  i t ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  h e a r i n g %  i t ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h e a r %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h e a r %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h e a r s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h e a r %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h e a r %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h e a r %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h e a r s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ y ī d ī c h ' ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  h e a r %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  h e a r %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  h e a r %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  h e a r %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h e a r d %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h e a r d %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h e a r d %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h e a r d %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h e a r d %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h e a r d %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h e a r d %  h i s %/ h e r %/ i t s %  v o i c e ] : [ y ī k ' ò s à %  d ī t s ' í "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  I %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t s ' ò n ī %  ì s à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  y o u %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t s ' ò n ī %  ì s à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t s ' ò n ī %  ì s à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  w e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t s ' ò n ī %  ì s à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t s ' ò n ī %  ì s à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  t h e y %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t s ' ò n ī %  ì s à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t s ' ò n ī %  ì s à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ I %  j u m p e d ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  j u m p e d ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  j u m p e d ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  j u m p e d ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  j u m p e d ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  j u m p e d ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  j u m p e d ] : [ g ú d ī d ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  j u m p i n g %  a l o n g %/ a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d á t ɫ ī ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  j u m p i n g %  a l o n g %/ a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d á t ɫ ī ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  j u m p i n g %  a l o n g %/ a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d á t ɫ ī ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  j u m p i n g %  a l o n g %/ a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d á t ɫ ī ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  j u m p i n g %  a l o n g %/ a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d á t ɫ ī ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  j u m p i n g %  a l o n g %/ a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d á t ɫ ī ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  j u m p i n g %  a l o n g %/ a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p ] : [ g ú d ī d á t ɫ ī ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  j u m p %  u p %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á g ū d ī ī t ɫ ō d "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
